North Carolina statutes. Chapter 116. Higher Education.
Article 1. The University of North Carolina.
§ 116-31.
Membership of the boards of trustees.

Repealed by Session Laws 2016-126, 4th Ex. Sess., s. 35, effective December 19, 2016. See editor’s note for applicability.

Effective July 1, 1972, a separate board of trustees shall be created for each of the following institutions: North Carolina State University at Raleigh, the University of North Carolina at Asheville, the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill, the University of North Carolina at Charlotte, the University of North Carolina at Greensboro, and the University of North Carolina at Wilmington.

Repealed by Session Laws 2016-126, 4th Ex. Sess., s. 35, effective December 19, 2016. See editor’s note for applicability.

Except as provided in

G.S. 116-65

, each of the 16 institutions of higher education set out in

G.S. 116-2(4)

shall have board of trustees composed of 13 persons chosen as follows:

Eight elected by the Board of Governors.

Repealed by Session Laws 2016-126, 4th Ex. Sess., s. 35, effective December 19, 2016. See editor’s note for applicability.

(2a)

Four members appointed by the General Assembly under

G.S. 120-121

, two of whom shall be appointed upon the recommendation of the President Pro Tempore of the Senate and two of whom shall be appointed upon the recommendation of the Speaker of the House of Representatives.

The president of the student government ex officio.

The Board of Trustees of the North Carolina School of Science and Mathematics shall be established in accordance with

G.S. 116-233

.

The term of office of all trustees, except the ex officio member, shall be four years, commencing on July 1 of odd-numbered years. In every odd-numbered year the Board of Governors shall elect four persons to each board of trustees and the General Assembly shall appoint one person upon the recommendation of the President Pro Tempore of the Senate and one person upon the recommendation of the Speaker of the House of Representatives to each such board.

In electing boards of trustees to serve commencing July 1, 1973, the Board of Governors shall designate four persons for four-year terms and four for two-year terms. The Governor, in making appointments of trustees to serve commencing July 1, 1973, shall designate two persons for four-year terms and two for two-year terms.

Any person who has served two full four-year terms in succession as a member of a board of trustees shall, for a period of one year, be ineligible for election or appointment to the same board but may be elected or appointed to the board of another institution.

No member of the General Assembly or officer or employee of the State, The University of North Carolina, or any constituent institution shall be eligible for election or appointment as a trustee. No spouse of a member of the General Assembly, or of an officer or employee of a constituent institution may be a trustee of that constituent institution. Any trustee who is elected or appointed to the General Assembly or who becomes an officer or employee of the State, The University of North Carolina, or any constituent institution or whose spouse is elected or appointed to the General Assembly or becomes an officer or employee of that constituent institution shall be deemed thereupon to resign from his or her membership on the board of trustees.

No person may serve simultaneously as a member of a board of trustees and as a member of the Board of Governors. Any trustee who is elected or appointed to the Board of Governors shall be deemed to resign as a trustee effective as of the date that his or her term commences as a member of the Board of Governors.

Whenever any vacancy shall occur in the membership of a board of trustees among those appointed by the General Assembly, it shall be the duty of the secretary of the board to inform the General Assembly of the existence of such vacancy, and the vacancy shall be filled as provided in

G.S. 120-122

, and whenever any vacancy shall occur among those elected by the Board of Governors, it shall be the duty of the secretary of the board to inform the Board of Governors of the existence of the vacancy, and the Board of Governors shall elect a person to fill the unexpired term. Whenever a member shall fail, for any reason other than ill health or service in the interest of the State or nation, to be present for three successive regular meetings of a board of trustees, his or her place as a member shall be deemed vacant.

History.

1971, c. 1244, s. 1; 2006-66, s. 9.11(g); 2007-278, s. 2; 2008-192, s. 5; 2016-126, 4th Ex. Sess., s. 35.

Cross References.

As to department reporting provisions on projects let without a performance or payment bond, see G.S. 143-129(i).

§ 116-31.10.
Powers of Board regarding certain purchasing contracts.

Notwithstanding

G.S. 143-53.1

or G.S. 143-53(a)(2), the expenditure benchmark for the President of The University of North Carolina or a special responsibility constituent institution with regard to competitive bid procedures and the bid value benchmark shall be an amount not greater than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000). The Board shall set the benchmark for the President and each institution from time to time. In setting the benchmark for the President or an institution in accordance with this section, the Board shall consider the overall capabilities including staff resources, purchasing compliance reviews, and audit reports of the President’s administrative staff or the institution. The Board shall also consult with the Director of the Division of Purchase and Contract and the Director of the Budget prior to setting the benchmark.

If the President or a constituent institution has an expenditure benchmark greater than two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000), the President or constituent institution shall comply with this subsection for any purchase greater than the President’s or institution’s benchmark set by the Board but not greater than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000). The President or institution shall submit to the Division of Purchase and Contract for that Division’s approval or other action deemed necessary by the Division a copy of all offers received and the President’s or institution’s recommendation of award or other action. Notice of the Division’s decision shall be sent to the President or the institution. The President or institution shall then proceed with the award of contract or other action recommended by the Division.

History.

1997-412, s. 1; 2003-312, s. 1; 2011-145, s. 9.6F(a); 2017-68, s. 4(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 9.6F(a), effective October 1, 2011, substituted “greater than the institution’s benchmark set by the Board” for “greater than two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000)” in the first sentence of subsection (b).

Session Laws 2017-68, s. 4(a), effective June 28, 2017, in subsection (a), added the President of The University of North Carolina, in the first sentence, added “the President and” in the second sentence, rewrote the third sentence which formerly read; “In setting an institution’s benchmark in accordance with this section, the Board shall consider the institution’s overall capabilities including staff resources, purchasing compliance reviews, and audit reports.”; in the first sentence in subsection (b) substituted “If the President or a constituent” for “Each”, added “the President or constituent institution” following “(250,000)”, added “President’s or” following “greater than the”, in the second sentence substituted “The President or” for “This”, added “President’s or” preceding “institution’s recommendation”, substituted “the President or the” for “that” near the end of the sentence, and added “President or” in the last sentence.

§ 116-31.11.
Powers of Board regarding certain fee negotiations, contracts, and capital improvements.

Notwithstanding

G.S. 143-341(3)

and

G.S. 143-135.1

, the Board shall, with respect to the design, construction, or renovation of buildings, utilities, and other property developments of The University of North Carolina requiring the estimated expenditure of public money of two million dollars ($2,000,000) or less:

Conduct the fee negotiations for all design contracts and supervise the letting of all construction and design contracts.

Develop procedures governing the responsibilities of The University of North Carolina and its affiliated and constituent institutions to perform the duties of the Department of Administration and the Director or Office of State Construction under

G.S. 133-1.1(d)

and

G.S. 143-341(3)

.

Develop procedures and reasonable limitations governing the use of open-end design agreements, subject to

G.S. 143-64.34

and the approval of the State Building Commission.

Use existing plans and specifications for construction projects, where feasible. Prior to designing a project, the Board shall consult with the Department of Administration on the availability of existing plans and specifications and the feasibility of using them for a project.

The Board may delegate its authority under subsection (a) of this section to a constituent or affiliated institution if the institution is qualified under guidelines adopted by the Board and approved by the State Building Commission and the Director of the Budget.

The University shall use the standard contracts for design and construction currently in use for State capital improvement projects by the Office of State Construction of the Department of Administration.

A contract may not be divided for the purpose of evading the monetary limit under this section.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this Chapter, the Department of Administration shall not be the awarding authority for contracts awarded pursuant to this section.

The Board of Governors shall annually report to the State Building Commission the following:

A list of projects governed by this section.

The estimated cost of each project along with the actual cost.

The name of each person awarded a contract under this section.

Whether the person or business awarded a contract under this section meets the definition of “minority business” or “minority person” as defined in G.S. 143-128.2(g).

History.

1997-412, s. 1; 2001-496, s. 8(a); 2005-300, ss. 1, 2; 2006-217, s. 2.

§ 116-31.12.
Acquisition and disposition of real property by lease.

Notwithstanding

G.S. 143-341(4)

, and in addition to the powers granted in

G.S. 116-198.34(5)

, the Board of Governors may authorize the constituent institutions and The University of North Carolina System Office to acquire or dispose of real property by lease if the lease is for a term of not more than 10 years. The Board of Governors shall establish a policy for acquiring and disposing of an interest in real property for the use of The University of North Carolina and its constituent institutions by lease. This policy may delegate authorization of the acquisition or disposition of real property by lease to the boards of trustees of the constituent institutions or to the President of The University of North Carolina. The Board of Governors shall submit all initial policies adopted pursuant to this section to the State Property Office for review prior to adoption by the Board. Any subsequent changes to these policies adopted by the Board of Governors shall be submitted to the State Property Office for review. Any comments by the State Property Office shall be submitted to the President of The University of North Carolina. After the acquisition or disposition of an interest in real property by lease, The University of North Carolina shall promptly file a report concerning the acquisition or disposition to the Secretary of Administration. Acquisitions and dispositions of an interest in real property by lease pursuant to this section shall not be subject to the provisions of Article 36 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes or to the provisions of Article 6 or 7 of Chapter 146 of the General Statutes.

History.

2007-322, s. 9; 2012-142, s. 9.10(a); 2013-360, s. 11.10(b); 2013-363, s. 3.12; 2014-100, s. 36.7(b); 2018-12, s. 4.

§ 116-32.
Officers and meetings of the boards of trustees.

At the first meeting after June 30 of each year each board of trustees shall elect from its membership a chairman, a vice-chairman and a secretary. Each board of trustees shall hold not less than three regular meetings a year and may hold such additional meetings as may be deemed desirable.

History.

1971, c. 1244, s. 1.

§ 116-33.
Powers and duties of the boards of trustees.

Each board of trustees shall promote the sound development of the institution within the functions prescribed for it, helping it to serve the State in a way that will complement the activities of the other institutions and aiding it to perform at a high level of excellence in every area of endeavor. Each board shall serve as advisor to the Board of Governors on matters pertaining to the institution and shall also serve as advisor to the chancellor concerning the management and development of the institution. The powers and duties of each board of trustees, not inconsistent with other provisions of this Article, shall be defined and delegated by the Board of Governors.

History.

1971, c. 1244, s. 1.

§ 116-33.1.
Board of trustees to permit recruiter access.

If a board of trustees provides access to its buildings and campus and the student information directory to persons or groups which make students aware of occupational or educational options, the board of trustees shall provide access on the same basis to official recruiting representatives of the military forces of the State and of the United States for the purpose of informing students of educational and career opportunities available in the military.

History.

1981, c. 901, s. 3.

§ 116-33.2.
Cooperative Extension Service employees.

The Board of Trustees of North Carolina State University shall adopt personnel policies governing the employment of the employees of the North Carolina Cooperative Extension Service who are exempted from certain provisions of Chapter 126 of the General Statutes pursuant to G.S. 126-5(c1)(9a).

History.

2007-195, s. 2.

§ 116-34.
Duties of chancellor of institution.

The chancellor shall be the administrative and executive head of the institution and shall exercise complete executive authority therein, subject to the direction of the President. He shall be responsible for carrying out policies of the Board of Governors and of the board of trustees. As of June 30 of each year he shall prepare for the Board of Governors and for the board of trustees a detailed report on the operation of the institution for the preceding year.

It shall be the duty of the chancellor to attend all meetings of the board of trustees and to be responsible for keeping the board of trustees fully informed on the operation of the institution and its needs.

It shall be the duty of the chancellor to keep the President, and through him the Board of Governors, fully informed concerning the operations and needs of the institution. Upon request, he shall be available to confer with the President or with the Board of Governors concerning matters that pertain to the institution.

Subject to policies prescribed by the Board of Governors and by the board of trustees, the chancellor shall make recommendations for the appointment of personnel within the institution and for the development of educational programs.

History.

1971, c. 1244, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment, “Circumvention by Delegation? An Analysis of North Carolina’s Open Meetings Law and the Byrd Loophole,” see 31 Campbell L. Rev. 535 (2009).

§ 116-35.
Electric power plants, campus school, etc.

Institutions operating electric power plants and distribution systems as of October 30, 1971, are authorized to continue such operation and, after furnishing power to the institution, to sell any excess current to the people of the community at a rate or rates approved by the Utilities Commission. Any net profits derived from the operation, or any proceeds derived from the lease or sale, of such power plants and distribution systems are appropriated and shall be paid into the permanent endowment fund held for the institution as provided for in

G.S. 116-36

. Institutions operating or authorized to operate, as of October 30, 1971, water or sewer distribution systems, may continue to do so. Each of the institutions now operating a campus laboratory or demonstration school may continue to do so under the presently existing plan of operation, consistent with the appropriations made therefor. The provisions of this section shall not apply to the University Enterprises of the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill, which shall continue to be governed in all respects as provided in Chapters 634 and 723 of the Session Laws of 1971,

G.S. 116-41.1

through 116-41.12, and other applicable legislation.

History.

1971, c. 1244, s. 1; 2006-203, s. 43.1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2006-203, s. 43.1, effective July 1, 2007, and applicable to the budget for the 2007-2009 biennium and each subsequent biennium thereafter, added “are appropriated and” following “distribution systems” in the first sentence.

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

The words “net profit”

were not intended to include funds which were needed to maintain the operating system. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Myron L. Coulter, Western Carolina University, 55 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 35 (1985).

Western Carolina University (WCU) is not a public utility subject to supervision by the Commission,

except that, pursuant to

G.S. 116-35

, sales to the public of excess power must be “at a rate or rates approved by the Utilities Commission.” See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Myron L. Coulter, Chancellor, Western Carolina University, 55 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 55 (1985).

As to voluntary, partial refund plan submitted by Western Carolina University (WCU) for approval to the Commission for refund of a portion of refund made to it by wholesaler incident to litigation to its own retail customers for the years involved, the language of the escheats statute, former G.S. 116B-15, did not become operative so as to mandate the escheating to the State Treasurer of unclaimed refunds, and as proposed to be treated by WCU to maintain the existing system for accounting purposes, the refunds did not constitute net profits which had to be turned over to the endowment fund. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Myron L. Coulter, Chancellor, Western Carolina University, 55 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 55 (1985).

§ 116-36.
Endowment fund.

The board of trustees of each constituent institution shall establish and maintain, pursuant to such terms and conditions, uniformly applicable to all constituent institutions, as the Board of Governors of the University of North Carolina may from time to time prescribe, an endowment fund for the constituent institution.

It is not the intent of this section that the proceeds from any endowment fund shall take the place of State appropriations or any part thereof, but it is the intent of this section that those proceeds shall supplement the State appropriations to the end that the institution may improve and increase its functions, may enlarge its areas of service, and may become more useful to a greater number of people.

Pursuant to the foregoing subsections and consistent with the powers and duties prescribed in this section, each board of trustees shall appoint an investment board to be known as “The Board of Trustees of the Endowment Fund of _______________ ” (here shall be inserted the name of the constituent institution).

The trustees of the endowment fund may receive and administer as part of the endowment fund gifts, and devises and any other property of any kind that may come to them from the Board of Governors of the University of North Carolina or that may come to the trustees of the endowment fund from any other source, excepting always the monies received from State appropriations and from tuition and fees collected from students and used for the general operation of the institution.

The trustees of the endowment fund shall be responsible for the prudent investment of the fund in the exercise of their sound discretion, without regard to any statute or rule of law relating to the investment of funds by fiduciaries but in compliance with any lawful condition placed by the donor upon that part of the endowment fund to be invested.

In the process of prudent investment of the fund or to realize the statutory intent of the endowment, the board of trustees of the endowment fund may expend or use interest and principal of gifts, and devises; provided that, the expense or use would not violate any condition or restriction imposed by the original donor of the property which is to be expended or used. To realize the statutory intent of the endowment fund, the board of trustees of the endowment fund may transfer interest or principal of the endowment fund to the useful possession of the constituent institution; provided that, the transfer would not violate any condition or restriction imposed by the original donor of the property which is the subject of the proposed transfer.

The trustees of the endowment fund shall have the power to buy, sell, lend, exchange, lease, transfer, or otherwise dispose of or to acquire (except by pledging their credit or violating a lawful condition of receipt of the corpus into the endowment fund) any property, real or personal, with respect to the fund, in either public or private transaction, and in doing so they shall not be subject to the provisions of Chapters 143, 143C, and 146 of the General Statutes; provided that, any expense or financial obligation of the State of North Carolina created by any acquisition or disposition, by whatever means, of any real or personal property of the endowment fund shall be borne by the endowment fund unless authorization to satisfy the expense or financial obligation from some other source shall first have been obtained from the Director of the Budget.

The Board of Governors of the University of North Carolina shall establish and maintain in a manner not inconsistent with the provisions of this section or with regulations established under this section an endowment fund for all endowment funds now held or hereafter acquired by the University of North Carolina for the benefit of the University as a whole, or for the joint benefit of any two or more constituent institutions of the University.

The Board of Governors of the University of North Carolina shall establish and maintain in a manner not inconsistent with the provisions of this section or with regulations established under this section an endowment fund for all endowment funds now held or hereafter acquired for the benefit of the University of North Carolina Press.

(i1)

The Board of Governors of the University of North Carolina shall establish and maintain in a manner not inconsistent with the provisions of this section or with regulations established under this section an endowment fund for all endowment funds now held or hereafter acquired for the benefit of the University of North Carolina Center for Public Media.

Any gift or devise of real or personal property to a constituent institution of the University of North Carolina or to the University of North Carolina or to the University of North Carolina Press or to the University of North Carolina Center for Public Media shall be presumed, nothing to the contrary appearing, a gift or devise, as the case may be, to the endowment fund of the respective institution or agency.

Whenever any property of an endowment fund authorized by this section is disposed of or otherwise transferred from the endowment fund, any instrument of transfer shall indicate that the donor, grantor, seller, lessor, lender, or transferor, as the case may be, is the board of trustees of the endowment fund.

The proceeds and funds described by this section are appropriated and may be used only as provided by this section.

Chapter 36E of the General Statutes applies to an endowment fund authorized by this section.

History.

1971, c. 1244, s. 1; 1977, c. 506; 1979, c. 649, ss. 2, 3; 1983, c. 717, s. 31; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 955, ss. 28, 29; 2006-203, ss. 44, 44.1; 2009-8, s. 5; 2011-284, s. 83(a), (b), (c); 2019-139, s. 2.1(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2006-203, ss. 44 and 44.1, effective July 1, 2007, and applicable to the budget for the 2007-2009 biennium and each subsequent biennium thereafter, in subsection (g), substituted “143, 143C, and 146” for “143 and 146” following “Chapters,” and deleted the former last sentence, which read: “Prior to taking any action under this subsection, the Director of the Budget may consult with the Advisory Budget Commission”;
and added subsection (
l
).

Session Laws 2009-8, s. 5, effective March 19, 2009, added subsection (m).

Session Laws 2011-284, s. 83, effective June 24, 2011, in subsections (d) and (f), substituted “and devises” for “devises, and bequests”; and in subsection (j), twice substituted “gift or devise” for “gift, devise, or bequest.”

Session Laws 2019-139, s. 2.1(a), effective July 19, 2019, substituted “Media” for “Television” once each in subsections (i1) and (j).

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Legal Aspects of Changing University Investment Strategies,” see 58 N.C.L. Rev. 189 (1980).

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

The endowment fund of the University of North Carolina Center for Public Television may enter into agreements with private or public entities for the use of the Center’s facilities to create commercial materials which may be unrelated to educational purposes, so long as the proceeds of such agreements are used for the benefit of the Center’s educational mission. See opinion of Attorney General to Leslie J. Winner, University of North Carolina Vice President and General Counsel, 2002 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 34 (10/16/02).

§ 116-36.1.
Regulation of institutional trust funds.

The Board is responsible for the custody and management of the trust funds of the University of North Carolina and of each institution. The Board shall adopt uniform policies and procedures applicable to the deposit, investment, and administration of these funds which shall assure that the receipt and expenditure of such funds is properly authorized and that the funds are appropriately accounted for. The Board may delegate authority, through the president, to the respective chancellors of the institutions when such delegation is necessary or prudent to enable the institution to function in a proper and expeditious manner.

Trust funds and investment earnings thereon, are available for expenditure by each institution without further authorization from the General Assembly.

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-145, s. 9.6E(a), effective July 1, 2011.

Trust funds are subject to the oversight of the State Auditor pursuant to Article 5A of Chapter 147 of the General Statutes but are not subject to the provisions of the State Budget Act except for capital improvements projects which shall be authorized and executed in accordance with

G.S. 143C-8-8

and

G.S. 143C-8-9

.

Each institution shall submit such reports or other information concerning its trust fund accounts as may be required by the Board or by the Director of the Budget.

Trust funds or the investment income therefrom shall not take the place of State appropriations or any part thereof, but any portion of these funds available for general institutional purposes is appropriated and shall be used to supplement State appropriations to the end that the institution may improve and increase its functions, may enlarge its areas of service, and may become more useful to a greater number of people.

As used in this section, “trust funds” means:

Monies, or the proceeds of other forms of property, received by an institution as gifts or devises that are neither presumed nor designated to be gifts or devises to the endowment fund of the institution;

Moneys received by an institution pursuant to grants from, or contracts with, the United States government or any agency or instrumentality thereof;

Moneys received by an institution pursuant to grants from, or contracts with, any State agencies, any political subdivisions of the State, any other states or nations or political subdivisions thereof, or any private entities whereby the institution undertakes, subject to terms and conditions specified by the entity providing the moneys, to conduct research, training or public service programs, or to provide financial aid to students;

Moneys collected by an institution to support extracurricular activities of students of the institution;

Moneys received from or for the operation by an institution of activities established for the benefit of scholarship funds or student activity programs;

Moneys received from or for the operation by an institution of any of its self-supporting auxiliary enterprises, including institutional student auxiliary enterprise funds for the operation of housing, food, health, and laundry services;

Moneys received by an institution in respect to fees and other payments for services rendered by medical, dental or other health care professionals under an organized practice plan approved by the institution or under a contractual agreement between the institution and a hospital or other health care provider;

The net proceeds from the disposition effected pursuant to Chapter 146, Article 7, of any interest in real property owned by or under the supervision and control of an institution if the interest in real property had first been acquired by gift or devise or through expenditure of monies defined in this subsection (g) as “trust funds,” except the net proceeds from the disposition of an interest in real property first acquired by the institution through expenditure of monies received as a grant from a State agency;

Moneys received from the operation and maintenance of institutional forests and forest farmlands, provided, that such moneys shall be used, when used, by the institution for support of forest-related research, teaching, and public service programs;

Moneys received from an activity authorized by G.S. 66-58(b)(8)m., n., and o.;

Moneys deposited to the State Education Assistance Authority Fund pursuant to

G.S. 116-209.3

;

Any other moneys collected by an institution as student fees previously approved by the Board of Governors.

Moneys received by an institution as tuition for digital learning programs provided with the support of a nonprofit corporation established by The University of North Carolina System Office pursuant to

G.S. 116-30.20

.

The Board may authorize, through the President, that the chancellors may deposit or invest each institution’s available trust fund cash balances in interest-bearing accounts and other investments as may be authorized by the Board in the exercise of its sound discretion, without regard to any statute or rule of law relating to the investment of funds by fiduciaries. For any cash balances placed on deposit with a bank in the form of traditional demand or time deposits, such as checking, savings, or certificate of deposit accounts, these cash balances shall be secured by deposit insurance, surety bonds, or investment securities satisfying the rules or regulations prescribed under

G.S. 147-79

.

The cash balances on hand as of June 30, 1978, and all future receipts accruing thereafter, of funds identified in this section are hereby appropriated to the use of the University of North Carolina and its constituent institutions.

History.

1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1136, s. 30; 1981, c. 529; 1983, c. 913, s. 19; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 936, s. 1(c); 2005-397, s. 3; 2006-203, s. 45; 2011-145, s. 9.6E(a); 2011-284, s. 84; 2012-142, s. 9.9; 2014-100, s. 11.4; 2015-241, s. 11.2; 2021-180, s. 8.24(f).

§ 116-36.2.
Regulation of special funds of individual institutions.

Notwithstanding Chapter 143C or any provisions of law other than Article 5A of Chapter 147 of the General Statutes, the chancellor of each institution is responsible for the custody and management of the special funds of that institution. The Board shall adopt uniform policies and procedures applicable to the administration of these funds which shall assure that the receipt and expenditure of such funds is properly authorized and that the funds are appropriately accounted for. The special funds of individual institutions regulated by this section are appropriated and may be used only as authorized by this section.

As used in this section, “special funds of individual institutions” means:

Moneys received from or for the operation by an institution of its program of intercollegiate athletics;

Moneys held by an institution as fiscal agent for individual students, faculty, staff members, and organizations.

History.

1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1136, s. 31; 1983, c. 913, s. 19; 2006-203, s. 46.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2006-203, s. 46, effective July 1, 2007, and applicable to the budget for the 2007-2009 biennium and each subsequent biennium thereafter, in subsection (a), added “Chapter 143C or” following “Notwithstanding”, and added the last sentence.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Sidelining Big Business in Intercollegiate Athletics: How the NCAA Can De-Escalate the Arms Race by Implementing a Budgetary Allocation for Athletic Departments,” see 39 N.C. Cent. L. Rev. 85 (2017).

§ 116-36.3.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1989 (Regular Session, 1990), c. 936, s. 1(b).

§ 116-36.4.
Vending facilities.

Each institution shall provide to the director of the Budget and the State Auditor such information as they may from time to time require concerning the use of net proceeds from operations of vending facilities for the previous fiscal year under

G.S. 116-36.1

. Net proceeds are appropriated and may be used only as authorized by the Board of Governors, but this section does not authorize expenditures for purposes not otherwise authorized by law.

History.

1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1034, s. 172; 1987, c. 738, s. 233(b); 1993, c. 406, s. 1; 1995, c. 507, s. 15.7; 2006-203, s. 46.1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2006-203, s. 46.1, effective July 1, 2007, and applicable to the budget for the 2007-2009 biennium and each subsequent biennium thereafter, added “are appropriated and” following “Net proceeds” in the last sentence.

§ 116-36.5.
Centennial Campus trust fund; Horace Williams Campus trust fund; Millennial Campuses’ trust funds.

All moneys received through development of the Centennial Campus of North Carolina State University at Raleigh, from whatever source, including the net proceeds from the lease or rental of Centennial Campus real property, shall be placed in a special, continuing, and nonreverting trust fund having the sole and exclusive use for further development of the Centennial Campus, including its operational development. This fund shall be treated in the manner of institutional trust funds as provided in

G.S. 116-36.1

, and, like the institutional trust funds, is exempt from Chapter 143C, except for Article 8 of Chapter 143C of the General Statutes. This fund shall be deemed an additional and alternative method of funding the Centennial Campus and not an exclusive one. For purposes of this section the term “Centennial Campus” is defined by

G.S. 116-198.33(4)

. To the extent that any general, special, or local law is inconsistent with this section, it is declared inapplicable to this section.

All moneys received through development of the Horace Williams Campus of the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill, from whatever source, including the net proceeds from the lease or rental of Horace Williams Campus real property, shall be placed in a special, continuing, and nonreverting trust fund having the sole and exclusive use for further development of the Horace Williams Campus, including its operational development. This fund shall be treated in the manner of institutional trust funds as provided in

G.S. 116-36.1

, and, like the institutional trust funds, is exempt from Chapter 143C, except for Article 8 of Chapter 143C of the General Statutes. This fund shall be deemed an additional and alternative method of funding the Horace Williams Campus and not an exclusive one. For purposes of this section the term “Horace Williams Campus” is defined by

G.S. 116-198.33(4a)

. To the extent that any general, special, or local law is inconsistent with this section, it is declared inapplicable to this section.

All moneys received through development of a Millennial Campus of a constituent institution of The University of North Carolina as defined by

G.S. 116-198.33(4b)

, from whatever source, including the net proceeds from the lease or rental of real property on a Millennial Campus, shall be placed in a special, continuing, and nonreverting trust fund having the sole and exclusive use for further development of that Millennial Campus, including its operational development. This fund shall be treated in the manner of institutional trust funds as provided in

G.S. 116-36.1

, and, like the institutional trust funds, is exempt from Chapter 143C, except for Article 8 of Chapter 143C of the General Statutes. This fund shall be deemed an additional and alternative method of funding the Millennial Campus and not an exclusive one. To the extent that any general, special, or local law is inconsistent with this section, it is declared inapplicable to this section.

The moneys described by this section are appropriated and may be used only as provided by this section.

History.

1987, c. 790, s. 1; 1998-159, s. 1; 1999-234, s. 1; 2000-177, ss. 1, 2; 2006-203, s. 47.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2006-203, s. 47, effective July 1, 2007, and applicable to the budget for the 2007-2009 biennium and each subsequent biennium thereafter, added “and, like the institutional trust funds, is exempt from Chapter 143C, except for Article 8 of Chapter 143C of the General Statutes” at the end of the second sentences of subsections (a) through (c); and added subsection (d).